extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX R   nut         nuc        nut is:participle
SFX R   nut         n          nut is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   nut         nme        nut is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   nut         nte        nut is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   nut         nul        nut is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   nut         nul        nut is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   nut         nul        nut is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   nut         nula       nut is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   nut         nulo       nut is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   nut         nuli       nut is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   iezt        eziem      riezt is:1st_person
SFX R   iezt        ezies      riezt is:2nd_person
SFX R   iezt        ezie       riezt is:3rd_person
SFX R   iezt        ezieme     riezt is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   iezt        eziete     riezt is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezt        ezu        riezt is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezt        ezuc       riezt is:participle
SFX R   iezt        ez         riezt is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   iezt        ezme       riezt is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iezt        ezte       riezt is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iezt        eziem      [^r]iezt is:1st_person
SFX R   iezt        ezies      [^r]iezt is:2nd_person
SFX R   iezt        ezie       [^r]iezt is:3rd_person
SFX R   iezt        ezieme     [^r]iezt is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   iezt        eziete     [^r]iezt is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezt        ezu        [^r]iezt is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   iezt        ezuc       [^r]iezt is:participle
SFX R   iezt        ez         [^r]iezt is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   iezt        ezme       [^r]iezt is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iezt        ezte       [^r]iezt is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   t           ol         [^r]iezt is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   t           ol         [^r]iezt is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   t           ol         [^r]iezt is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   t           la         [^r]iezt is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   t           lo         [^r]iezt is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   t           li         [^r]iezt is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   t           ol         [^i]ezt is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   t           ol         [^i]ezt is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   t           ol         [^i]ezt is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   t           la         [^i]ezt is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   t           lo         [^i]ezt is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   t           li         [^i]ezt is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   t           iem        [^ey]zt is:1st_person
SFX R   t           ies        [^ey]zt is:2nd_person
SFX R   t           ie         [^ey]zt is:3rd_person
SFX R   t           ieme       [^ey]zt is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   t           iete       [^ey]zt is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   t           u          [^ey]zt is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   t           uc         [^ey]zt is:participle
SFX R   zt          z          [^ey]zt is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   t           me         [^ey]zt is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   t           te         [^ey]zt is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   t           ol         [^e]zt is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   t           ol         [^e]zt is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   t           ol         [^e]zt is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   t           la         [^e]zt is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   t           lo         [^e]zt is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   t           li         [^e]zt is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   yzt         yziem      yzt is:1st_person
SFX R   yzt         yzies      yzt is:2nd_person
SFX R   yzt         yzie       yzt is:3rd_person
SFX R   yzt         yzieme     yzt is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   yzt         yziete     yzt is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   yzt         yzu        yzt is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   yzt         yzuc       yzt is:participle
SFX R   yzt         yz         yzt is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   yzt         yzme       yzt is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   yzt         yzte       yzt is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative

SFX b Y 8  # v testovani: pred podst. mena vzoru dub s -u v G a -e L
SFX b   0           u          [klr] is:genitive
SFX b   0           om         [klr] is:dative
SFX b   0           y          [klr] is:nominative is:plural
SFX b   0           ov         [klr] is:genitive is:plural
SFX b   0           y          [klr] is:accusative is:plural
SFX b   0           och        [klr] is:locative is:plural
SFX b   0           om         [klr] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX b   0           mi         [klr] is:instrumental is:plural

SFX n Y 15  # v testovani: pre cislovky
SFX n   0           nasobny    . po:adjective
SFX n   0           nasobna    . po:adverb
SFX n   0           nasobne    . po:adverb
SFX n   0           nasobni    . po:verb is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX n   0           nasobny    . po:adjective is:nominative
SFX n   0           nasobna    . po:adjective is:nominative is:feminine
SFX n   0           nasobne    . po:adjective is:nominative is:feminine is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobne    . po:adjective is:nominative is:neuter is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobni    . po:adjective is:nominative is:masculine is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobnych  . po:adjective is:genitive is:masculine is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobnych  . po:adjective is:genitive is:neuter is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobnych  . po:adjective is:accusative is:masculine is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobne    . po:adjective is:accusative is:feminine is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobne    . po:adjective is:accusative is:neuter is:plural
SFX n   0           nasobnymi  . po:adjective is:instrumental is:plural
