extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
balik/b po:noun is:masculine
brat/RN po:verb
chrcat/RN po:verb
cumiet/RN po:verb
devatdesiatsest/n po:number
devatstodevatdesiatdevattisic/n po:number
devatstodevatdesiattri/n po:number
devatstodvadsatpattisic/n po:number
devatstojedentisic/n po:number
devatstoosemdesiatsesttisic/n po:number
devatstopatdesiatjedentisic/n po:number
devatstopattisic/n po:number
devatstosedemdesiatsesttisic/n po:number
devatstosestdesiatjedentisic/n po:number
devatstosesttisic/n po:number
devatstostyridsatsedemtisic/n po:number
devatstotridsatjeden/n po:number
devatstotrinasttisic/n po:number
dohoriet/RN po:verb
dokrucat/RN po:verb
dopiect/RN po:verb
dotiect/RN po:verb
dozrat/RN po:verb
dvadsatkrat/n po:number
dvadsattisicdvesto/n po:number
dvestodevat/n po:number
dvestodevatdesiatstyri/n po:number
dvestodvadsatosem/n po:number
dvestojeden/n po:number
dvestoosemdesiatpattisic/n po:number
dvestopatdesiatdevattisic/n po:number
dvestopatdesiattisic/n po:number
dvestosedemdesiatpat/n po:number
dvestosestdesiatdevat/n po:number
dvestosestdesiattisic/n po:number
dvestostyridsatosem/n po:number
dvestotridsat/n po:number
dvestotridsatstyritisic/n po:number
dvetisicstosedemdesiatdva/n po:number
dychcat/RN po:verb
expander/b po:noun is:masculine
gaucat/RN po:verb
hryzt/RN po:verb
jojcat/RN po:verb
kultivator/b po:noun is:masculine
kvicat/RN po:verb
lezat/RN po:verb
mak/b po:noun is:masculine
maser/b po:noun is:masculine
mlcat/RN po:verb
mrncat/RN po:verb
nabrat/RN po:verb
nadrat/RN po:verb
naklast/RN po:verb
namliet/RN po:verb
napiect/RN po:verb
napucat/RN po:verb
natlct/RN po:verb
navraviet/RN po:verb
obdrat/RN po:verb
obidvoch/n po:number
obist/RN po:verb
oborat/RN po:verb
obvinut/RN po:verb
odhrmiet/RN po:verb
odmiest/RN po:verb
odorat/RN po:verb
odrast/RN po:verb
odtiect/RN po:verb
odvinut/RN po:verb
ohryzt/RN po:verb
opomenut/RN po:verb
osemdesiatpat/n po:number
osemstodevat/n po:number
osemstodevatdesiatstyri/n po:number
osemstodvadsatosem/n po:number
osemstojeden/n po:number
osemstoosemdesiatsedem/n po:number
osemstopatdesiatdva/n po:number
osemstopatdesiattritisic/n po:number
osemstosedemdesiatsedem/n po:number
osemstosestdesiatdva/n po:number
osemstosestdesiattritisic/n po:number
osemstostyridsatpat/n po:number
osemstotridsatdevattisic/n po:number
osemstotridsattri/n po:number
osinut/RN po:verb
oval/b po:noun is:masculine
ozrat/RN po:verb
patdesiatosem/n po:number
patstodesat/n po:number
patstodevatdesiatsest/n po:number
patstodvadsatjeden/n po:number
patstodvanasttisic/n po:number
patstoosemdesiatpat/n po:number
patstopatdesiatdevat/n po:number
patstopatdesiattisic/n po:number
patstosedemdesiatpat/n po:number
patstosestdesiatdevat/n po:number
patstosestdesiattisic/n po:number
patstostyridsatosem/n po:number
patstotridsat/n po:number
patstotridsatstyritisic/n po:number
personal/b po:noun is:masculine
plustat/RN po:verb
podletiet/RN po:verb
podomliet/RN po:verb
podsunut/RN po:verb
pohoriet/RN po:verb
poklast/RN po:verb
polotvar/b po:noun is:masculine
pomliet/RN po:verb
popliest/RN po:verb
pospat/RN po:verb
povliect/RN po:verb
prastat/RN po:verb
predist/RN po:verb
predviest/RN po:verb
prehryzt/RN po:verb
prekypiet/RN po:verb
premoct/RN po:verb
prepast/RN po:verb
preriect/RN po:verb
pretriast/RN po:verb
prevliect/RN po:verb
priast/RN po:verb
priliezt/RN po:verb
priniest/RN po:verb
prirast/RN po:verb
priviest/RN po:verb
prsat/RN po:verb
rincat/RN po:verb
rozhrmiet/RN po:verb
rozjest/RN po:verb
rozmiest/RN po:verb
rozodrat/RN po:verb
rozpliest/RN po:verb
rozpucat/RN po:verb
roztriast/RN po:verb
rozvraviet/RN po:verb
rycat/RN po:verb
sedemdesiatjeden/n po:number
sedemnasttisic/n po:number
sedemstodevatdesiatsedem/n po:number
sedemstodvadsatdva/n po:number
sedemstodvadsattritisic/n po:number
sedemstoosemdesiatosem/n po:number
sedemstopat/n po:number
sedemstopatdesiatstyri/n po:number
sedemstosedemdesiatosem/n po:number
sedemstosest/n po:number
sedemstosestdesiatstyri/n po:number
sedemstostyridsatjeden/n po:number
sedemstotisic/n po:number
sedemstotridsatsesttisic/n po:number
sestdesiatjeden/n po:number
sestnasttisic/n po:number
seststodevatdesiatsedem/n po:number
seststodvadsatdva/n po:number
seststodvadsattritisic/n po:number
seststoosemdesiatosem/n po:number
seststopat/n po:number
seststopatdesiatstyri/n po:number
seststosedemdesiatosem/n po:number
seststosest/n po:number
seststosestdesiatstyri/n po:number
seststostyridsatjeden/n po:number
seststotisic/n po:number
seststotridsatsesttisic/n po:number
skrcat/RN po:verb
skucat/RN po:verb
spat/RN po:verb
spomenut/RN po:verb
srsat/RN po:verb
stodevatdesiatdevattisic/n po:number
stodevatdesiattri/n po:number
stodvadsatpattisic/n po:number
stojedentisic/n po:number
stoosemdesiatsesttisic/n po:number
stopatdesiatjedentisic/n po:number
stopattisic/n po:number
stosedemdesiatsesttisic/n po:number
stosestdesiatjedentisic/n po:number
stosesttisic/n po:number
stostyridsatsedemtisic/n po:number
stotrinasttisic/n po:number
striezt/RN po:verb
styristodevatdesiatdvatisic/n po:number
styristodvadsatsedemtisic/n po:number
styristoosemdesiatstyritisic/n po:number
styristosedemdesiat/n po:number
styristosestdesiatosemtisic/n po:number
styristostyridsatsesttisic/n po:number
styritisic/n po:number
sustat/RN po:verb
sycat/RN po:verb
tester/b po:noun is:masculine
tonut/RN po:verb
tristodevatdesiatjeden/n po:number
tristodvadsatsest/n po:number
tristoosemdesiattisic/n po:number
tristosedemdesiatdevat/n po:number
tristosestdesiatpat/n po:number
tristostyridsatstyri/n po:number
ubrat/RN po:verb
ujst/RN po:verb
upiect/RN po:verb
uslysat/RN po:verb
utlct/RN po:verb
uviezt/RN po:verb
vhrnut/RN po:verb
visiet/RN po:verb
vmysliet/RN po:verb
vpliest/RN po:verb
vrndzat/RN po:verb
vyhrmiet/RN po:verb
vylezat/RN po:verb
vypliest/RN po:verb
vyslysat/RN po:verb
vyvinut/RN po:verb
vzrast/RN po:verb
zachripiet/RN po:verb
zafucat/RN po:verb
zajajcat/RN po:verb
zamiest/RN po:verb
zaobliect/RN po:verb
zariect/RN po:verb
zaspat/RN po:verb
zatriast/RN po:verb
zavrtiet/RN po:verb
zhryzt/RN po:verb
zmliet/RN po:verb
zosinut/RN po:verb
zurcat/RN po:verb
